Illinois, session 104th, SB2887.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unemployment Insurance Act is amended by 5adding Section 401.1 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 405/401.1 new)7    Sec. 401.1. Formula for the duration of benefits. 8    (a) The Department of Employment Security shall make 9payments to beneficiaries under this Act as follows:10        (1) payments for 12 weeks if this State's average 11    unemployment rate is below 5%; and12        (2) an additional week in addition to the 12 weeks for 13    each 0.5% increment in this State's average unemployment 14    rate above 5%, not to exceed 23 weeks if this State's 15    average equals or exceeds 10.5%.16    (b) The Department shall calculate the State's average 17unemployment rate and publish the rate on the Department's 18publicly available website.19    (c) This Section shall only apply to beneficiaries who 20begin receiving benefits on or after the effective date of 21this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.22    (d) The Department shall adopt rules to implement this 23Section.  SB2887- 2 -LRB104 18712 SPS 32155 b1    (e) If there is a conflict between a provision of this 2Section and another Section of this Act, this Section 3controls. 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 51, 2027.